District of Columbia statutes.
34-2111

Sanitary sewer service charges for churches and institutions.

The sanitary sewer service charges applicable to such churches and institutions as may under existing law be furnished water without charge by the Mayor of the District of Columbia shall be predicated only on the quantity of water used in excess of the amount fixed by the Mayor in each case as to which no water charge is made.

May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 108, ch. 218, title II, § 211
1981 Ed., § 43-1611.
1973 Ed., § 43-1610.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.